updated/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="uT/a__v">

<!-- verbal noun -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>anA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>anA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>
<!--added by varshith 28/08/24-->
<!-- verbal adjective-->

<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<!-- <e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e> -->
<e><p><l>A_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:vj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>awA_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>A_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>


 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="akada"><i>akad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Azka"><i>Azk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="baGAra"><i>baGAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Bakosa"><i>Bakos</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="barawa"><i>baraw</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bAzca"><i>bAzc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Beja"><i>Bej</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="biCala"><i>biCal</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="biKara"><i>biKar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bixaka"><i>bixak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Bugawa"><i>Bugaw</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="BUna"><i>BUn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Caka"><i>Cak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Capa"><i>Cap</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cataka"><i>Catak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cezka"><i>Cezk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="CIla"><i>CIl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cira"><i>cir</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cuBa"><i>cuB</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cupa"><i>cup</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dAla"><i>dAl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="data"><i>dat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dUba"><i>dUb</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="gamaka"><i>gamak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="gira"><i>gir</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="grasa"><i>gras</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gura"><i>Gur</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="guzWa"><i>guzW</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="hAzPa"><i>hAzP</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jada"><i>jad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="JakaJOra"><i>JakaJOr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jAna"><i>jAn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="JAzka"><i>JAzk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="JoMka"><i>JoMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="juta"><i>jut</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kaha"><i>kah</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="KarIxa"><i>KarIx</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kawara"><i>kawar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kilakAra"><i>kilakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="KoMsa"><i>KoMs</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kUja"><i>kUj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kUxa"><i>kUx</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lalaka"><i>lalak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="laxa"><i>lax</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lipata"><i>lipat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="maca"><i>mac</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mara"><i>mar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mazja"><i>mazj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mUda"><i>mUd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nakAra"><i>nakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nibata"><i>nibat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nipata"><i>nipat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="paCAda"><i>paCAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Pahara"><i>Pahar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="palata"><i>palat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pasIja"><i>pasIj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="paXAra"><i>paXAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PeMta"><i>PeMt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pisa"><i>pis</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="posa"><i>pos</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PuPakAra"><i>PuPakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="ragada"><i>ragad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="rewa"><i>rew</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="rUTa"><i>rUT</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="samaJa"><i>samaJ</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="saXa"><i>saX</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sIKa"><i>sIK</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="soca"><i>soc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sulaJa"><i>sulaJ</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tala"><i>tal</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tAzga"><i>tAzg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="TiTura"><i>TiTur</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="TUzsa"><i>TUzs</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="ubata"><i>ubat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uGAda"><i>uGAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uKAda"><i>uKAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uPana"><i>uPan</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="vaMca"><i>vaMc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="waga"><i>wag</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="WAma"><i>WAm</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="warASa"><i>warAS</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="wurapa"><i>wurap</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xahAda"><i>xahAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xapata"><i>xapat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
